Massachusetts, session 194th, H596.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 37 the following section:- 
Section 38. MassCore 
(a) The department shall, in collaboration with the MassCore advisory council established 
pursuant to subsection (d) and subject to the approval of the board, develop, implement and 
administer a statewide program of study, to be known as MassCore, to align high school courses 
with college and workforce expectations and to ensure that all students are prepared to be 
knowledgeable, empowered and civically engaged adults who can thrive upon high school 
graduation and throughout their lives. MassCore shall, except as otherwise herein provided, be a 
required program of study for all high school students in the commonwealth beginning with 
students entering ninth grade in the 2027-2028 school year. 

of 7 12  (b) MassCore shall consist of four units of English, four units of mathematics, three units 
of a lab-based science, three units of history, two units of the same world language, one unit of 
the arts and five additional core elective courses; provided, however, that the MassCore program 
of study may be amended upon a joint recommendation to the board by the department and the 
MassCore advisory council and subject to the approval of the board. 
All MassCore courses shall be aligned with the appropriate grade-level standards in the 
Massachusetts curriculum frameworks. School districts and educators shall have flexibility and 
professional autonomy in selecting curriculum and in designing and administering teaching and 
learning in line with the appropriate grade-level standards. 
(c) The department shall, in collaboration with the MassCore advisory council and 
subject to the approval of the board, develop and promulgate regulations governing the 
implementation, administration and enforcement of this section, which shall include, but not be 
limited to: (i) creating a waiver process by which certain student subgroups, including, but not 
limited to, multilingual learners, students with disabilities and students who are newly enrolled in 
a public school in the commonwealth may be exempt from some or all of the MassCore 
requirements; (ii) creating a process by which school districts may, subject to approval by the 
department, award high school credit in compliance with this section for MassCore-equivalent 
courses taken in middle school; (iii) creating a process by which school districts may receive a 
temporary waiver of the requirements of this section due to a demonstrated hardship; (iv) 
ensuring flexibility for students in selecting courses that satisfy the MassCore requirements, 
including within subject areas, and ensuring flexibility in meeting the MassCore requirements for 
students enrolled in state-approved career and technical education programs; (v) establishing a 
reporting process for school districts to demonstrate compliance with the MassCore 

of 7 35 requirements; and (vi) establishing a process for recommending changes or updates to MassCore 
that shall include public input. 
Said regulations shall be developed using a transparent and inclusive process that 
meaningfully engages students, educators, administrators, parents and other stakeholders, 
particularly those from historically marginalized and underserved communities and populations. 
In developing said regulations, the department and the MassCore advisory council shall jointly 
convene not less 
than 2 public meetings across the commonwealth, shall create and administer a statewide 
survey open to members of the public and available in multiple languages, and may hold 
additional hearings and other forums as necessary. 
(d) There shall be a MassCore advisory council to collaborate with and advise the 
department on all matters related to MassCore and the implementation of this section. The 
advisory council shall consist of: 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts 
Teachers Association; 1 member who shall be appointed by the American Federation of 
Teachers, Massachusetts; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Association of 
School Superintendents, Inc.; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts 
Association of School Committees, Inc.; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts 
Parent Teachers Association; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts 
Association of Regional Schools; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts 
Association of Vocational Administrators Inc.; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
Massachusetts School Counselors Association; 1 member who shall be a high school student 
appointed by the Massachusetts Association of Student Representatives; 1 member who shall be 

of 7 57 appointed by the NAACP; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Immigrant 
and Refugee Advocacy Coalition; 1 member who shall be appointed by Citizens for Public 
Schools; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Advocates for Children; 1 
member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Consortium for Innovative Education 
Assessment; and 1 member who shall be a researcher from a public university in the 
commonwealth with expertise in the area of public elementary and secondary education, selected 
by the members of the advisory council. 
The advisory council shall determine the means of conducting its work and shall meet as 
often as the members shall determine. The department and the advisory council shall meet at 
least quarterly. 
(e) By December 31, 2025, school districts shall report to the department on their 
capacity to comply with this section. The report shall be submitted in a form and manner 
prescribed by the department and shall include, but not be limited to, whether a district is already 
in compliance with the course requirements of this section and, for those districts not already in 
compliance, an estimate of additional financial costs directly related to coming into compliance 
and whether such costs will create a demonstrated financial hardship for the school district 
including, but not limited to, by directly resulting in cuts to existing school staff, courses or 
programs. 
By February 1, 2026, the department shall submit to the general court a request for an 
appropriation to those school districts with a demonstrated financial hardship, as determined by 
the department, for the total costs associated with coming into compliance with the requirements 
of this section. The MassCore course and program requirements in this section shall not be in 

of 7 79 effect for students in said school districts until such a time that said appropriation is made to said 
school districts. 
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a school district from 
implementing MassCore prior to the 2027-2028 school year or from implementing course or unit 
requirements for students that exceed the requirements of MassCore. 
SECTION 2. (a) There shall be a special commission to study and make 
recommendations for more authentic and accurate methods of assessing students in the 
commonwealth. The 
commission shall examine: (i) the requirements of the Every Student Succeeds Act of 
2015, codified at 20 U.S.C. § 6301 et. seq., and potential waivers; (ii) alternative assessment 
measures in place or being considered nationwide; and (iii) research data on the knowledge and 
skills that parents, elementary and secondary educators, higher education educators, and business 
leaders want students to have upon high school graduation. 
Regarding the assessment of students, the special commission shall consider assessments 
other than conventional methods, including, but not limited to: work samples, capstone, service 
learning or other projects, portfolios, performance assessments and other authentic and direct 
gauges of student performance that encourage effective instruction, use strategies for avoiding 
racial and ethnic biases, and recognize the strengths of all students. 
The commission shall recommend strategies for assessing students that comply with 
current federal law. The commission may also make recommendations for changes in or waivers 
from federal law that would facilitate the implementation of effective assessment strategies. 

of 7 100  (b) The commission shall consist of: 1 member who shall be appointed by the president 
101 of the senate, who shall serve as co-chair; 1 member who shall be appointed by the speaker of 
102 the house of representatives, who shall serve as co-chair; 1 member who shall be appointed by 
103 the minority leader of the senate; 1 member who shall be appointed by the minority leader of the 
104 house of representatives; the secretary of education, or a designee; the commissioner of 
105 elementary and secondary education, or a designee; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
106 Massachusetts Association of School Committees, Inc.; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
107 Massachusetts Teachers Association; 1 member who shall be appointed by the American 
108 Federation of Teachers, Massachusetts; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts 
109 Association of School Superintendents, Inc.; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
110 Massachusetts Association of Regional Schools; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
111 Massachusetts Association of Vocational Administrators Inc.; 1 member who shall be appointed 
112 by the Massachusetts Education Justice Alliance; 1 member who shall be appointed by Citizens 
113 for Public Schools; 1 member who shall be appointed by the NAACP; 1 member who shall be 
114 appointed by the Massachusetts Immigrant and Refugee Advocacy Coalition; 1 member who 
115 shall be appointed by Multicultural Education, Training, and Advocacy, Inc; 2 members who 
116 shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Consortium for Innovative Education Assessment, 1 of 
117 whom shall be a high school student attending a public high school in the consortium; 1 member 
118 who shall be a high school student appointed by Youth SOL; 1 member who shall be a high 
119 school student appointed by the Massachusetts Association of Student Representatives; 1 
120 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts School Counselors Association; 1 member 
121 who shall be appointed by the Black Educators Alliance of Massachusetts; 1 member who shall 
122 be appointed by the Massachusetts Asian American Educators Association; 1 member who shall 

of 7 123 be appointed by the Gaston Institute for Latino Community Development and Public Policy of 
124 the University of Massachusetts Boston; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts 
125 Advocates for Children; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Organization of 
126 Educational Collaboratives; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Parent 
127 Teachers Association; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Center for Law and Education; 1 
128 member who shall be appointed by the Center for Antiracist Research at Boston University; 1 
129 member who shall be appointed by the Rural Policy Advisory Commission; 1 member who shall 
130  be appointed by GLSEN Massachusetts; and 1 member who shall be a researcher from a 
131 public university in the commonwealth with expertise in the area of assessment, selected jointly 
132 by the members of the commission. Members shall not receive compensation for their services 
133 but may receive reimbursement for reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out their 
134 responsibilities as members of the commission. The commissioner of elementary and secondary 
135 education shall furnish reasonable staff and other support for the work of the commission. 
136  (c) When conducting its work and issuing its recommendations, the commission shall use 
137 a transparent and inclusive process that meaningfully engages students, educators, 
138 administrators, parents and other stakeholders, particularly those from historically marginalized 
139 and underserved communities and populations. The commission shall hold not less than 5 public 
140 meetings across the regions of the commonwealth, shall create and administer a statewide survey 
141 open to members of the public and available in multiple languages, and may hold additional 
142 hearings and other forums as necessary. The commission shall file its report and 
143 recommendations with the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives and the chairs of 
144 the joint committee on education not later than August 31, 2026.